Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Department of Veterans’ Affairs, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for the
following purposes:
(1) For services provided
by the Department of
Veterans’ Affairs ...................... $ 6,553,642
(2) For payments to counties
pursuant to ORS 406.462 ........... $ 1,954,773
(3) For payments to veterans’
service organizations
pursuant to ORS 406.310 ........... $ 127,920
(4) For debt service ........................ $ 371,660
SECTION 2.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from lottery moneys allocated from  the Veterans’ Services Fund established
under ORS 406.140 to the Department of Veterans’ Affairs, for the following purposes:
(1) For services provided
by the Department of
Veterans’ Affairs ...................... $ 12,496,892
(2) For payments to counties
pursuant to ORS 406.462 ........... $ 7,474,669
(3) For payments to veterans’
service organizations
pursuant to ORS 406.310 ........... $ 497,880
(4) For debt service ........................ $ 690,010
SECTION 3.
(1) Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$115,372,793 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the  maximum limit for
payment of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts
and the Oregon War Veterans’ Bond  Sinking Account, but excluding lottery funds and fed-
Enrolled House Bill 5036 (HB 5036-A) Page 1
eral funds, collected or received by the Department of  Veterans’ Affairs for administration,
grants and services supplied to veterans.
(2) This section does not limit expenditures from the Oregon War Veterans’ Bond Sinking
Account for purposes described in section 5 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$1,617,844 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses from federal funds collected or received by the Department of Veterans’
Affairs.
SECTION 5. For the  biennium beginning July 1, 2021, expenditures by the Department
of Veterans’ Affairs for the following purposes are not limited:
(1) Debt service;
(2) Professional services and related costs associated directly with bond sales;
(3) Loans to veterans; and
(4) Payments on behalf of borrowers for  property taxes, city liens, fire insurance, mort-
gage cancellation insurance and repairs to and miscellaneous charges for  borrower-owned
property that are charged to the loan account and repaid along with the payment  of loan
interest and principal.
SECTION 6.
This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
Passed by House June 15, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 22, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5036 (HB 5036-A) Page 2